Louisiana, session 2026, HB1128.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5002(D)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:5029(G) and 5068(F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5002. Awards and amounts
* * *
D.(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, a student who is
eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant to this Chapter and who is enrolled:
(a) In an eligible public college or university that does not offer an academic
undergraduate degree at the baccalaureate level in those associate's degree or other
shorter-term training and education programs as determined by the advisory council
pursuant to R.S. 17:3047.1, Louisiana Works, shall be awarded by the state an
amount determined by the administering agency to equal the tuition and fees charged
by the college or university during the 2016-2017 academic year. If such council
Louisiana Works determines that a program is no longer aligned with those
priorities, an otherwise eligible student who had previously received an award and
enrolled in that program may continue to use the award.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2689 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1128
(b) In an eligible college or university other than as provided for in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph in those associate's degree or other shorter-term
training education programs as determined by the advisory council pursuant to R.S.
17:3047.1, Louisiana Works, shall be awarded by the state an amount determined by
the administering agency to equal the weighted average of the tuition amounts
charged to students attending an eligible public college or university that does not
offer an academic undergraduate degree at the baccalaureate level during the 2016-
2017 academic year tuition and fees charged by the college or university. If such
council Louisiana Works determines that a program is no longer aligned with those
priorities, an otherwise eligible student who had previously received an award and
enrolled in that program may continue to use the award.
* * *
§5029. Alternative initial eligibility requirements
* * *
G.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 17:5002, the administering
agency may issue a TOPS-Tech award to an individual who fits into one of the
following categories:
(a) He is a student participating in a registered apprenticeship at a registered
apprenticeship sponsor approved by Louisiana Works.
(b) He is an employee at a workforce provider approved by Louisiana
Works.
(2) The award amount for the categories provided in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection shall be equal to the average tuition and fees amounts charged to students
attending an eligible college or university in a qualifying program as determined by
Louisiana Works pursuant to R.S. 17:5002.
(3) The Board of Regents, in coordination with Louisiana Works, shall track
program completion, employment placement, earnings outcomes, and other measures
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2689 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1128
of return on investment. Underperforming programs may be removed from
eligibility in accordance with standards established by rule.
* * *
§5068. Miscellaneous
* * *
F. Relative to TOPS-Tech, the Board of Regents and Louisiana Works shall
submit an annual report to the legislature summarizing participation, employment
outcomes, wage outcomes, regional impact, and return on investment.